Nevada, session 83, SB111.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 201 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, a person shall
not sell, offer for sale or purchase child remains.
2. The provisions of subsection 1 do not apply to the sale or
purchase of child remains by a hospital, accredited medical
school, dental school or institution of higher education if the sale
or purchase is related to education, research or a similar purpose.
3. A person who violates the provisions of subsection 1 is
guilty of a misdemeanor.
-
*SB111*

– 2 –
4. As used in this section:
(a) “Child” means a person who is less than 18 years of age.
(b) “Child remains” means the body of a deceased child, or
part of the body which has been removed from a living child, in
any stage of decomposition.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*SB111*